src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-tyrvy_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - тӹрвӹ: # Noun 'lip / huulet'
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Nom: тӹрвӹ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Gen: тӹрвӹн
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Acc: тӹрвӹм
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Com: тӹрвӹге
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Dat: тӹрвӹлӓн
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Ine: тӹрвӹштӹ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Ill: тӹрвӹшкӹ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Lat: тӹрвеш
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Cmpr: тӹрвӹлӓ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Abe: тӹрвӹде
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Nom: тӹрвӹвлӓ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Gen: тӹрвӹвлӓн
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Acc: тӹрвӹвлӓм
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Com: тӹрвӹвлӓге
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Dat: тӹрвӹвлӓлӓн
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Ine: тӹрвӹвлӓштӹ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Ill: [тӹрвӹвлӓшкӹ, тӹрвӹвлӓш]
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Lat: тӹрвӹвлӓэш
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Cmpr: тӹрвӹвлӓлӓ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Abe: тӹрвӹвлӓде

     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+So/CP: тӹрвем 
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+So/PC: тӹрвемӹн
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+So/PC: тӹрвемӹм
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+So/PC: тӹрвемге
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+So/PC: тӹрвемлӓн
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1+So/CP: тӹрвӹштем
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1+So/CP: тӹрвӹшкем
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg1+So/CP: тӹрвешем
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/PC: тӹрвемлӓ 
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/CP: тӹрвӹлӓэм 
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1+So/CP: тӹрвӹдеэм 
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1+So/PC: тӹрвемде
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/NCP: тӹрвӹвлӓэм
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/PNC: тӹрвемвлӓ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+So/PNC: тӹрвемвлӓн
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1+So/PNC: тӹрвемвлӓм
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1+So/PNC: тӹрвемвлӓге
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1+So/NPC: тӹрвӹвлӓэмге
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+So/PNC: тӹрвемвлӓлӓн
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+So/NPC: тӹрвӹвлӓэмлӓн
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+So/NCP: тӹрвӹвлӓлӓнем
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1+So/NCP: тӹрвӹвлӓштем
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1+So/PNC: тӹрвемвлӓштӹ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1+So/PNC: тӹрвемвлӓшкӹ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1+So/NCP: тӹрвӹвлӓшкем
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg1+So/PNC: тӹрвемвлӓэш
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg1+So/NCP: тӹрвӹвлӓэшем
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/PNC: тӹрвемвлӓлӓ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/NCP: тӹрвӹвлӓлӓэм
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/NPC: тӹрвӹвлӓэмлӓ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1+So/NPC: тӹрвӹвлӓэмде
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1+So/PNC: тӹрвемвлӓде
#тӹрвет, тӹрветшӹ, 
#тӹрвӹжӹ, 
